Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2606
Funds; use by municipality.

Money received by a municipality or credited to its account from the fund shall be used for one of the following purposes:

(1) To pay for the construction, acquisition, or equipping of infrastructure projects or portions thereof; or

(2) To pay principal, interest, premium, and costs of issuance on bonds issued by the municipality to finance the construction, acquisition, or equipping of infrastructure projects or portions thereof.

Laws 1989, LB 683, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 9.